Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 4. Commonwealth of Virginia Federal Transportation Grant Anticipation Revenue Notes Act of 2011.

§ 33.2-1511.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Federal highway reimbursements”
means all federal-aid highway construction reimbursements and any other federal highway assistance received from time to time by the Commonwealth under or in accordance with Title 23 of the United States Code or any successor program established under federal law from the Federal Highway Administration and any successor or additional federal agencies.

“GARVEE,”
a grant anticipation revenue vehicle, means an “eligible debt financing instrument” as defined under 23 U.S.C. § 122, the principal of and interest on which and certain other costs associated therewith may be reimbursed by federal highway reimbursements.

“Notes”
means those notes authorized and issued pursuant to §

33.2-1512

.

“Project-specific reimbursements”
means the federal highway reimbursements received by the Commonwealth only with respect to the project or projects to be financed by the Notes or any series thereof.

“Series”
means any grouping of Notes issued as designated as such by the Board as necessary or desirable for administrative convenience, satisfaction of federal tax or securities law requirements, or any similar purpose.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.14; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1512.
Authorization of Notes.

The Board is hereby authorized, by and with the consent of the Governor, to issue, pursuant to the provisions of the Transportation Development and Revenue Bond Act (§

33.2-1700

et seq.), in one or more series revenue obligations of the Commonwealth to be designated “Commonwealth of Virginia Federal Transportation Grant Anticipation Revenue Notes, Series
_______________
_______________
” (the Notes), provided that the aggregate principal amount outstanding at any time shall not exceed the amount authorized pursuant to the second enactments of Chapters 1019 and 1044 of the Acts of Assembly of 2000, as amended by Chapter 655 of the Acts of Assembly of 2005, less any principal amounts outstanding from revenue obligations issued pursuant to those enactments prior to July 1, 2011, and exclusive of (i) the amount of any revenue obligations that may be issued to refund Notes issued under this article or the revenue obligations issued under those enactments in accordance with §

33.2-1727

and (ii) any amounts issued for financing expenses (including any original issue discount).

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.15; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1513.
Use of proceeds of Notes.

The net proceeds of the Notes shall be used exclusively for the purpose of providing funds, together with any other available funds, for paying the costs incurred or to be incurred for construction or funding of such projects to be designated by the Board.

The proceeds of Notes, including any premium received on the sale thereof, shall be made available by the Board to pay costs of the projects and, where appropriate, may be paid to any authority, locality, commission, or other entity for the purposes of paying for costs of the projects. The proceeds of Notes may be used together with any federal, local, or private funds that may be made available for such purpose. The proceeds of Notes, together with any investment earnings thereon, may at the discretion of the Board secure the payment of principal or purchase price of and redemption premium, if any, and interest on Notes.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.16; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1514.
Details of Notes.

The terms and structure of each issue of Notes shall be determined by the Board, subject to approval by the Treasury Board if required in accordance with §

2.2-2416

. The Notes of each issue shall be dated; shall be issued in a principal amount (subject to the limitation as to amount outstanding at any one time set forth in §

33.2-1512

); shall bear interest at such rate or rates that may be fixed, adjustable, variable, or a combination thereof, and may be determined by a formula or other method; shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 20 years after the issuance thereof; and may be made subject to purchase or redemption before their maturity or maturities, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions, all as may be determined by the Board. The Board shall determine the form and series designations of Notes, whether Notes are certificated or uncertificated, and fix the authorized denomination or denominations of Notes and the place or places of payment of principal or purchase price of, and redemption premium, if any, and interest on, Notes, which may be at the office of the State Treasurer or any bank or trust company within or outside of the Commonwealth. The principal or purchase price of, and redemption premium, if any, and interest on, Notes shall be made payable in lawful money of the United States of America. Each issue of Notes may be issued under a system of book entry for recording the ownership and transfer of ownership of rights to receive payments of principal or purchase price of and redemption premium, if any, and interest on such Notes. All Notes shall have and are hereby declared to have, as between successive holders, all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law of the Commonwealth.

The Board may sell Notes from time to time at public or private sale, by competitive bidding, negotiated sale, or private placement, for such price or prices as it may determine to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.17; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1515.
Form and manner of execution; signature of person ceasing to be officer.

The Notes shall be signed on behalf of the Board by the chairman or vice-chairman of the Board, or shall bear the facsimile signature of such officer, and shall bear the official seal of the Board, which shall be attested by the manual or facsimile signature of the secretary or assistant secretary of the Board. In the event that Notes shall bear the facsimile signature of the chairman or vice-chairman of the Board, such Notes shall be signed by such administrative assistant as the chairman of the Board shall determine or by any registrar/paying agent that may be designated by the Board. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any Notes shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such Notes, such signature or facsimile signature nevertheless shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if such officer had remained in office until such delivery.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.18; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1516.
Authority to obtain GARVEE approval.

The Board is authorized to seek any necessary approvals for the issuance of Notes as GARVEEs from the Federal Highway Administration and any successor or additional federal agencies.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.19; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1517.
Expenses.

All expenses incurred under this article or in connection with issuance of Notes shall be paid from the proceeds of such Notes or from any available funds as the Board shall determine.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.20; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1518.
Deposit of proceeds.

The proceeds of each series of Notes shall be placed by the State Treasurer in a special fund in the state treasury or may be placed with a trustee in accordance with §

33.2-1716

and shall be disbursed only for the purpose for which such series is issued.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.21; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1519.
Other funds.

The Board is hereby authorized to receive any other funds that may be made available to pay costs of the projects and, subject to appropriation by the General Assembly or allocation or designation by the Board, to make available the same to the payment of the principal or purchase price of, and redemption premium, if any, and interest on Notes authorized hereby and to enter into the appropriate agreements to allow for those funds to be paid into the state treasury, or to a trustee in accordance with §

33.2-1716

to pay a part of the costs of the projects or to pay principal or purchase price of, and redemption premium, if any, and interest on Notes.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.22; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1520.
Application of project-specific reimbursements.

In accordance with Article X, Section 7 of the Constitution of Virginia and §

2.2-1802

, all federal highway reimbursements are paid into the state treasury. In connection with each series of Notes issued pursuant to this article, the Board shall establish a fund in accordance with §

33.2-1720

either in the state treasury or with a trustee in accordance with §

33.2-1716

, which secures and is used for the payment of such series of Notes to the credit of which there shall be deposited such amounts, appropriated therefor by the General Assembly, as are required to pay principal or purchase price of and redemption premium, if any, and interest on Notes, as and when due and payable, (i) first from the project-specific reimbursements; (ii) then, at the discretion of the Board, to the extent required, from legally available revenues of the Transportation Trust Fund; and (iii) then from such other funds, if any, that are designated by the General Assembly for such purpose.

The Board is authorized to provide that the pledge of federal highway reimbursements and any other federal highway assistance received for all or any series of the Notes will be subordinate to any prior pledge thereof to notes issued pursuant to subdivision 8 of §

33.2-1701

and the second enactments of Chapters 1019 and 1044 of the Acts of Assembly of 2000, as amended, and that the obligation to make transfers of federal highway reimbursements and any other federal highway assistance received or other amounts into any fund established under subsection A will be subordinate to the obligation to make any required payments or deposits on or with respect to notes issued pursuant to subdivision 8 of §

33.2-1701

and the second enactments of Chapters 1019 and 1044 of the Acts of Assembly of 2000, as amended.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.23; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1521.
Investment of proceeds and other amounts.

Notes proceeds and moneys in any reserve funds and sinking funds in respect of Notes shall be invested by the State Treasurer in accordance with the provisions of general law relating to the investment of such funds belonging to or in the control of the Commonwealth or by a trustee in accordance with §

33.2-1716

.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.24; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1522.
Exemption from taxation.

The interest income from and any profit made on the sale of the Notes issued under the provisions of this article shall at all times be free and exempt from taxation by the Commonwealth and by any municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.25; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1523.
Notes as eligible securities.

All Notes issued under the provisions of this article are hereby made securities in which all persons and entities listed in §

33.2-1713

may properly and legally invest funds under their control.

History.

2011, cc. 830, 868, § 33.1-23.26; 2014, c. 805.